Hawaii statutes.
[§291D-11] Time computation. In
computing any period of time prescribed or allowed by this chapter, the day of
the act, event, or default from which the period of time begins to run shall
not be included. The last day of the period so computed shall be included,
unless it is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday in which event the period
runs until the end of the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal
holiday. Intermediate Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays shall be
included. Whenever an act required to be performed under this chapter may be
accomplished by mail, the act shall be deemed to have been performed on the
date of the postmark on the mailed article. [L 1993, c 214, pt of §2]

Rules of Court

Computation of time, see HCTR rule 21.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next